Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-314
Cabin trailer, defined.

Cabin trailer means any trailer designed for living quarters and for being towed by a motor vehicle and not exceeding one hundred two inches in width, forty feet in length, or thirteen and one-half feet in height, except as provided in subdivision (2)(k) of section 60-6,288.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 14.